Maryland, session 2026, HB1039.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
5–244.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1039*

HOUSE BILL 1039
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ALTERNATIVE SCHOOL” MEANS:
(I) A PUBLIC SCHOOL THAT IS:
1. NOT A FAILING SCHOOL; AND
2. LOCATED IN THE SAME COUNTY AS A FAILING SCHOOL
IN WHICH A STUDENT IS ENROLLED;
(II) A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL; OR
(III) A BOARDING SCHOOL, INCLUDING A MILITARY BOARDING
SCHOOL.
(3) “FAILING SCHOOL” MEANS A SCHOOL THAT HAS BEEN GIVEN ONE
STAR UNDER THE STAR RATING SYSTEM FOR AT LEAST THE PRIOR 3 CONSECUTIVE
SCHOOL YEARS.
(4) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE BROADENING OPTIONS AND
OPPORTUNITIES FOR STUDENTS TODAY PROGRAM.
(5) “STAR RATING SYSTEM” MEANS THE SYSTEM THAT AWARDS A
SCORE TO A PUBLIC SCHOOL UNDER THE STATE ACCOUNTABILITY SYSTEM
ADOPTED BY THE STATE BOARD AS REQUIRED BY THE FEDERAL EVERY STUDENT
SUCCEEDS ACT.
(6) “TOTAL PER PUPIL AMOUNT” MEANS THE COUNTY BOARD PER
PUPIL SPENDING FOR THE EDUCATION AID PROGRAMS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, AND BASED ON THE STAR
RATINGS AWARDED UNDER THE STAR RATING SYSTEM DURING THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING DECEMBER, EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL PROVIDE THE FOLLOWING
INFORMATION TO THE PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN OF EACH STUDENT WHO
ATTENDS A FAILING SCHOOL:
(I) NOTIFICATION THAT THE SCHOOL IS A FAILING SCHOOL;
AND
(II) A LIST OF AVAILABLE ALTERNATIVE SCHOOL OPTIONS.

HOUSE BILL 1039 3
(2) A SCHOOL SHALL CONTINUE TO BE DESIGNATED AS A FAILING
SCHOOL UNTIL THE SCHOOL RECEIVES AT LEAST A TWO–STAR RATING FOR 2
CONSECUTIVE SCHOOL YEARS.
(C) (1) A STUDENT ATTENDING A FAILING SCHOOL SHALL BE PROVIDED
THE OPPORTUNITY TO ATTEND AN ALTERNATIVE SCHOOL.
(2) ON OR BEFORE APRIL 1 OF THE YEAR IN WHICH A PARENT OR
LEGAL GUARDIAN RECEIVES INFORMATION UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION, THE PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN OF THE STUDENT SHALL NOTIFY THE
COUNTY BOARD OF THE STUDENT’S DECISION TO:
(I) CONTINUE ATTENDING THE CURRENT SCHOOL; OR
(II) ATTEND A PARTICULAR ALTERNATIVE SCHOOL.
(D) (1) THERE IS A BROADENING OPTIONS AND OPPORTUNITIES FOR
STUDENTS TODAY PROGRAM.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE:
(I) SCHOLARSHIPS FOR STUDENTS WHO ARE ELIGIBLE FOR
THE FREE AND REDUCED PRICE LUNCH PROGRAM TO ATTEND A NONPUBLIC
SCHOOL; AND
(II) RIGHT TO LEARN SCHOLARSHIPS FOR STUDENTS WHO
ATTEND A FAILING SCHOOL AND CHOOSE TO ATTEND A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(4) (I) FOR EACH STUDENT WHO RECEIVES A RIGHT TO LEARN
SCHOLARSHIP UNDER THE PROGRAM, THE APPLICABLE COUNTY BOARD SHALL
REMIT FUNDS TO THE DEPARTMENT EQUAL TO THE TOTAL PER PUPIL AMOUNT.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL RETURN ANY UNUSED FUNDS
REMITTED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH TO THE COUNTY BOARD.
(5) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT
THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBSECTION.
5–245.

HOUSE BILL 1039
(A) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL PROVIDE A LIST OF AVAILABLE MILITARY
BOARDING SCHOOL OPTIONS TO THE PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN OF EACH
STUDENT WHO:
(1) THE SCHOOL ADMINISTRATOR DETERMINES IS VIOLENT; OR
(2) RECEIVES CONTINUOUS DISCIPLINARY ACTION, AS DETERMINED
BY THE SCHOOL ADMINISTRATOR.
(B) A PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN WHO RECEIVES A LIST OF AVAILABLE
MILITARY BOARDING SCHOOL OPTIONS UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL NOTIFY THE COUNTY BOARD OF THE STUDENT’S DECISION TO:
(1) CONTINUE ATTENDING THE CURRENT SCHOOL; OR
(2) ATTEND A MILITARY BOARDING SCHOOL.
(C) THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM OF A STUDENT WHO THE SCHOOL
ADMINISTRATOR DETERMINES IS VIOLENT OR HAS RECEIVED CONTINUOUS
DISCIPLINARY ACTION SHALL PAY FOR THE STUDENT TO ATTEND A MILITARY
BOARDING SCHOOL INCLUDED ON THE LIST PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.